Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.150

Custodian's expenses, compensation, and bond.

(1) A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian's duties.

(2) Except for one who is a transferor under RCW 11.114.040, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

(3) Except as provided in RCW 11.114.180(6), a custodian need not give a bond.

(4) Notwithstanding RCW 11.114.190, a custodian not compensated for services is not liable for losses to the custodial property unless they result from bad faith, intentional wrongdoing, or gross negligence, or from failure to maintain the standard of prudence in investing the custodial property provided in this chapter.

[ 1991 c 193 s 15.]